Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1403
Water Well Decommissioning Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Water Well Decommissioning Fund. The State Treasurer shall credit to the fund for the uses and purposes of sections 46-1401 to 46-1405 such money as is specifically appropriated and such funds, fees, donations, gifts, services, or devises or bequests of real or personal property received by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment from any source, federal, state, public, or private, to be used by the department for the purpose of accelerating the decommissioning of illegal water wells. The department shall allocate money from the fund for purposes of sections 46-1401 to 46-1405. The fund shall be exempt from provisions relating to lapsing of appropriations. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Water Well Decommissioning Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1994, LB 981, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 44;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 238;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 22;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 268.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.